District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2105

Admission of indigent insane of District.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., § 4844
Mar. 3, 1877, 19 Stat. 347, ch. 105
July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 309, ch. 209, § 1
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(a), (u)

History

1981 Ed., § 32-605.
1973 Ed., § 32-405.

Prior Codifications

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.

Effective Dates